Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-4] Consolidated permit application
and review process. (a) The department is designated as the lead agency
for the purposes of this chapter and, in addition to its existing functions,
shall establish and administer the consolidated permit application and review
process provided for in this chapter, which shall incorporate the permitting
functions of those agencies involved in the development of the project which
are transferred by section 196D-10 to the department to effectuate the purposes
of this chapter.

(b) The consolidated permit application and
review process shall incorporate:

(1) A list of all permits required for the project;

(2) The role and functions of the department as the
lead agency and the interagency group;

(3) All permit review and approval deadlines;

(4) A schedule for meetings and actions of the
interagency group;

(5) A mechanism to resolve any conflicts that may
arise between or among the department and any other agencies, including any
federal agencies, as a result of conflicting permit, approval, or other
requirements, procedures, or agency perspectives;

(6) Any other administrative procedures related to
the foregoing; and

(7) A consolidated permit application form to be used
for the project for all permitting purposes.

(c) The department shall perform all of the
permitting functions for which it is currently responsible and which are
transferred to it by section 196D-10 for the purposes of the project, and shall
coordinate and consolidate all required permit reviews by other agencies, and
to the fullest extent possible by all federal agencies, having jurisdiction
over any aspect of the project. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next